Florida, session 2026, SB1680.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 134 135 Section 1.âSection 63.213, Florida Statutes, is amended to 136 read: 137 63.213âPreplanned adoption agreement.â 138 (1)âIndividuals may enter into a preplanned adoption 139 arrangement as specified in this section, but the such 140 arrangement may not do any of the following in any way: 141 (a)âEffect final transfer of custody of a child or final 142 adoption of a child without review and approval of the court and 143 without compliance with other applicable provisions of law. 144 (b)âConstitute consent of a biological mother to place her 145 biological child for adoption until 48 hours after the birth of 146 the child and unless the court making the custody determination 147 or approving the adoption determines that the mother was aware 148 of her right to rescind within the 48-hour period after the 149 birth of the child but chose not to rescind her such consent. 150 The volunteer motherâs right to rescind her consent in a 151 preplanned adoption applies only when the child is genetically 152 related to her. 153 (c)âAuthorize the adoption of a child by an intended parent 154 who is a disqualified person. 155 (d)âAuthorize the adoption of a child conceived through a 156 gestational surrogacy or surrogacy arrangement that is governed 157 by s. 742.15. 158 (2)âA preplanned adoption agreement must include, but need 159 not be limited to, all of the following terms: 160 (a)âThat the biological volunteer mother is pregnant and 161 agrees to become pregnant by the fertility technique specified 162 in the agreement, to bear the child, and to terminate any 163 parental rights and responsibilities to the child she might have 164 through a written consent executed at the same time as the 165 preplanned adoption agreement, subject to a right of rescission 166 by the volunteer mother any time within 48 hours after the birth 167 of the child, if the volunteer mother is genetically related to 168 the child. 169 (b)âThat the biological volunteer mother agrees to submit 170 to reasonable medical evaluation and treatment and to adhere to 171 reasonable medical instructions about her prenatal health. 172 (c)âThat the biological volunteer mother acknowledges that 173 she is aware that she will assume parental rights and 174 responsibilities for the child born to her as otherwise provided 175 by law for a mother if the intended father and intended mother 176 terminate the agreement before final transfer of custody is 177 completed, if a court determines that a parent clearly specified 178 by the preplanned adoption agreement to be the biological parent 179 is not the biological parent, or if the preplanned adoption is 180 not approved by the court pursuant to the Florida Adoption Act. 181 (d)âThat an intended father who is also the biological 182 father acknowledges that he is aware that he will assume 183 parental rights and responsibilities for the child as otherwise 184 provided by law for a father if the agreement is terminated for 185 any reason by any party before final transfer of custody is 186 completed or if the planned adoption is not approved by the 187 court pursuant to the Florida Adoption Act. 188 (e)âThat the intended father and intended mother 189 acknowledge that they may not receive custody or the parental 190 rights under the agreement if the biological volunteer mother 191 terminates the agreement or if the volunteer mother rescinds her 192 consent to place her child for adoption within 48 hours after 193 the birth of the child, if the volunteer mother is genetically 194 related to the child. 195 (e)(f)âThat the intended father and intended mother may 196 agree to pay all reasonable legal, medical, psychological, or 197 psychiatric expenses of the biological volunteer mother related 198 to the preplanned adoption arrangement and may agree to pay the 199 reasonable living expenses and wages lost due to the pregnancy 200 and birth of the biological volunteer mother and reasonable 201 compensation for inconvenience, discomfort, and medical risk. No 202 other compensation, whether in cash or in kind, may shall be 203 made pursuant to a preplanned adoption arrangement. 204 (f)(g)âThat the intended father and intended mother agree 205 to accept custody of and to assert full parental rights and 206 responsibilities for the child immediately upon the childâs 207 birth, regardless of any impairment to the child. 208 (h)âThat the intended father and intended mother shall have 209 the right to specify the blood and tissue typing tests to be 210 performed if the agreement specifies that at least one of them 211 is intended to be the biological parent of the child. 212 (g)(i)âThat the agreement may be terminated at any time by 213 any of the parties. 214 (h)âThat the parties understand that the agreement is void 215 and that a court may not approve the proposed adoption if any 216 intended parent is a disqualified person as defined in this 217 section. 218 (3)âA preplanned adoption agreement may shall not contain 219 any provision: 220 (a)âTo reduce any amount paid to the biological volunteer 221 mother if the child is stillborn or is born alive but impaired, 222 or to provide for the payment of a supplement or bonus for any 223 reason. 224 (b)âRequiring the termination of the biological volunteer 225 motherâs pregnancy. 226 (4)âA pregnant female and, if married, her spouse and the 227 intended parents must have independent legal representation by 228 an attorney who is a member in good standing of The Florida Bar 229 before entering into and throughout the duration of the 230 preplanned adoption agreement regarding the terms and potential 231 legal consequences of the agreement. Each attorney must be 232 identified in the preplanned adoption agreement. A single 233 attorney for the biological mother and her spouse, if married, 234 and a single attorney for the intended parents are sufficient to 235 meet this requirement An attorney who represents an intended 236 father and intended mother or any other attorney with whom that 237 attorney is associated shall not represent simultaneously a 238 female who is or proposes to be a volunteer mother in any matter 239 relating to a preplanned adoption agreement or preplanned 240 adoption arrangement. 241 (5)âPayment to agents, finders, and intermediaries, 242 including attorneys and physicians, as a finderâs fee for 243 finding biological volunteer mothers or matching a biological 244 volunteer mother and intended father and intended mother is 245 prohibited. Doctors, psychologists, attorneys, and other 246 professionals may receive reasonable compensation for their 247 professional services, such as providing medical services and 248 procedures, legal advice in structuring and negotiating a 249 preplanned adoption agreement, or counseling. 250 (6)(a)âAfter the intended parents petition a court for the 251 approval of the adoption of a child who is the subject of a 252 preplanned adoption agreement, the clerk of the court shall 253 request and obtain a level 2 security background investigation 254 as described in s. 435.04 of each of the intended parents from 255 the Department of Law Enforcement and provide the results to the 256 court. 257 (b)âThe court shall review the results of the security 258 background investigation and may not approve a proposed adoption 259 of a child by an intended parent who is a disqualified person. 260 (7)âIf a proposed adoption is denied because an intended 261 parent is a disqualified person, the biological mother retains 262 all parental rights to the child. 263 (8)âAs used in this section, the term: 264 (a)ââDisqualified personâ means a person who fails to meet 265 the level 2 screening standards under s. 435.04 âBlood and 266 tissue typing testsâ include, but are not limited to, tests of 267 red cell antigens, red cell isoenzymes, human leukocyte 268 antigens, and serum proteins. 269 (b)ââChildâ means the child or children conceived by means 270 of a fertility technique that is part of a preplanned adoption 271 arrangement. 272 (c)ââFertility techniqueâ means artificial embryonation, 273 artificial insemination, whether in vivo or in vitro, egg 274 donation, or embryo adoption. 275 (b)(d)ââIntended fatherâ means a male who, as evidenced by 276 a preplanned adoption agreement, intends to assert the parental 277 rights and responsibilities for a child who is the subject of a 278 preplanned adoption agreement conceived through a fertility 279 technique, regardless of whether the child is biologically 280 related to the male. 281 (c)(e)ââIntended motherâ means a female who, as evidenced 282 by a preplanned adoption agreement, intends to assert the 283 parental rights and responsibilities for a child who is the 284 subject of a preplanned adoption agreement conceived through a 285 fertility technique, regardless of whether the child is 286 biologically related to the female. 287 (d)(f)ââPartyâ means the intended father, the intended 288 mother, the biological volunteer mother, or the biological 289 volunteer motherâs husband, if she has a husband. 290 (e)(g)ââPreplanned adoption agreementâ means a written 291 agreement among the parties which that specifies the intent of 292 the parties as to their rights and responsibilities in the 293 preplanned adoption arrangement, consistent with the provisions 294 of this section. 295 (f)(h)ââPreplanned adoption arrangementâ means the 296 arrangement through which the parties enter into an agreement 297 for the biological volunteer mother to bear the child, for 298 payment by the intended father and intended mother of the 299 expenses allowed by this section, for the intended father and 300 intended mother to assert full parental rights and 301 responsibilities to the child if consent to adoption is not 302 rescinded after birth by a biological volunteer mother who is 303 genetically related to the child, and for the biological 304 volunteer mother to terminate, subject to any right of 305 rescission, all her parental rights and responsibilities to the 306 child in favor of the intended father and intended mother. 307 (i)ââVolunteer motherâ means a female at least 18 years of 308 age who voluntarily agrees, subject to a right of rescission if 309 it is her biological child, that if she should become pregnant 310 pursuant to a preplanned adoption arrangement, she will 311 terminate her parental rights and responsibilities to the child 312 in favor of the intended father and intended mother. 313 Section 2.âSection 383.61, Florida Statutes, is created to 314 read: 315 383.61âAssisted reproduction facilities.â 316 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 317 (a)ââAgencyâ means the Agency for Health Care 318 Administration. 319 (b)ââAssisted reproductive technologyâ means procreative 320 procedures which involve the laboratory handling of human eggs, 321 sperm, or preembryos, including, but not limited to, in vitro 322 fertilization embryo transfer, gamete intrafallopian transfer, 323 pronuclear stage transfer, tubal embryo transfer, and zygote 324 intrafallopian transfer. 325 (c)ââCommissioning coupleâ means the intended father and 326 mother of a child who will be conceived by means of assisted 327 reproductive technology using the eggs or sperm of at least one 328 of the intended parents. 329 (d)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Health. 330 (e)ââDisqualified personâ means a person who fails to meet 331 the level 2 screening standards under s. 435.04. 332 (f)ââDonorâ means a person who donates reproductive 333 material, regardless of whether the donation is for personal use 334 or for compensation. The term does not include an intended 335 mother or intended father who provides eggs or sperm, 336 respectively, to be used for assisted reproduction. 337 (g)ââDonor bankâ means any facility that collects 338 reproductive material from donors for use by a fertility clinic. 339 (h)ââEggâ means the unfertilized female reproductive cell. 340 (i)ââFertility clinicâ means a facility in which 341 reproductive materials are subject to assisted reproductive 342 technology for the purpose of implantation. 343 (j)ââHealth care practitionerâ has the same meaning as in 344 s. 456.001. 345 (k)ââPreembryoâ means the product of fertilization of an 346 egg by a sperm until the appearance of the embryonic axis. 347 (l)ââRecipientâ means a person who receives, through 348 implantation, reproductive material from a donor. 349 (m)ââReproductive materialâ means any human egg, sperm, or 350 preembryo. 351 (n)ââSpermâ means the male reproductive cell. 352 (o)ââSurrogacy agencyâ means a person who is certified 353 pursuant to s. 402.89 and is in the business of matching, 354 supervising, or coordinating intended parents, gestational 355 surrogates, and surrogates as defined in s. 402.89; providing 356 case management, screening, or counseling services to intended 357 parents, gestational surrogates, or surrogates; or referring 358 intended parents, gestational surrogates, and surrogates to 359 third-party reproductive services. 360 (p)ââThird-party reproductive servicesâ means services 361 offered by a donor bank or fertility clinic licensed under this 362 section related to the use of eggs, sperm, or preembryos that 363 have been donated by a person to enable a couple to become 364 parents. The term includes services related to gestational 365 surrogacy and surrogacy arrangements. 366 (2)âRULES.âBy December 31, 2026, the agency, in 367 consultation with the department, shall adopt rules establishing 368 all of the following for donor banks and fertility clinics: 369 (a)âMinimum laboratory standards for embryology, 370 cryopreservation, and specimen handling. 371 (b)âMinimum training requirements for embryologists and 372 laboratory staff. 373 (c)âLicensure application and renewal procedures and 374 documentation requirements. 375 (d)âSanitation and infection control requirements. 376 (e)âStandards for storing, monitoring, and securing 377 reproductive material. 378 (f)âThe format and required content of patient disclosures. 379 (g)âIncident reporting procedures and thresholds. 380 (3)âLICENSURE.âA donor bank or fertility clinic may not 381 operate without a license issued by the agency under this 382 section. Donor banks and fertility clinics in operation as of 383 the date that rules initially adopted under this section become 384 effective shall have 6 months from that date to become licensed. 385 A license is valid for 2 years unless suspended or revoked for 386 cause. 387 (4)âBEST PRACTICE POLICIES.â 388 (a)âBy January 1, 2027, each donor bank, fertility clinic, 389 and health care practitioner who provides assisted reproductive 390 technology in this state shall develop written best practice 391 policies consistent with 42 U.S.C. s. 263a(f). 392 (b)âSuch best practice policies must be submitted to the 393 appropriate licensing agency or department annually for review. 394 (c)âAll reproductive material stored by a donor bank, 395 fertility clinic, or health care practitioner must be clearly 396 labeled. 397 (d)âA donor bank, fertility clinic, or health care 398 practitioner shall maintain all records for at least 30 years. 399 (5)âINSPECTIONS.âThe agency shall perform annual 400 inspections of donor banks and fertility clinics. 401 (6)âPENALTIES.âA donor bank or fertility clinic in 402 violation of subsection (3) or subsection (4) is subject to the 403 penalties provided in s. 400.995. The agency may refer 404 violations involving health care practitioners to the department 405 for disciplinary action under chapter 456. 406 (7)âDISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS.âA fertility clinic shall 407 obtain express and informed consent from all participants 408 regarding the proposed treatment, procedure, or process related 409 to services that will be provided by the clinic. 410 (a)âA fertility clinic shall provide to a participant a 411 written document that is in plain language and includes, at a 412 minimum, all of the following: 413 1.âA description of the known and potential risks, 414 consequences, and benefits of assisted reproductive technology. 415 2.âA statement that there may be foreseen or unforeseen 416 legal consequences and that it is advisable to seek independent 417 legal counsel. 418 3.âA description of applicable confidentiality protections 419 and a statement that such protections apply to the extent 420 allowed by law. 421 4.âA statement that a participant has access to all of his 422 or her medical records to the extent allowed by law and may 423 request copies of such records from the fertility clinic. The 424 fertility clinic may charge reasonable fees for copies of such 425 records as authorized by law. 426 5.âIf applicable, a disclosure that a commissioning couple 427 has the right to access a summary of medical and psychological 428 information about donors and gestational surrogates. 429 6.âThe policy of the fertility clinic, if applicable, 430 regarding the number of embryos transferred and any limitation 431 on the number of embryos transferred, as well as the existence 432 of national guidelines as published by the American Society for 433 Reproductive Medicine and the Society for Assisted Reproductive 434 Technology. 435 7.âInformation generally explaining and clarifying parental 436 rights of all participants. 437 8.âAny other disclosures required by state or federal law. 438 9.âA statement that all disclosures have been made pursuant 439 to this subsection. 440 (b)âA participant gives express and informed consent by 441 signing the written document required under paragraph (a). In 442 order for the express and informed consent to be valid, the 443 document must meet all of the following requirements: 444 1.âBe dated and signed by the fertility clinic and the 445 participant. 446 2.âSpecify the length of time that the consent remains 447 valid. 448 3.âAdvise the participant signing the document of the right 449 to receive a copy of the document. 450 (8)âNOTICE OF DISQUALIFIED PERSON.âIf a donor bank or 451 fertility clinic receives notice from a surrogacy agency that a 452 donor, a participant, or an intended parent is a disqualified 453 person, the donor bank or fertility clinic must immediately 454 cease using any reproductive material retained by the donor bank 455 or fertility clinic pertaining to that individual. 456 Section 3.âSection 402.89, Florida Statutes, is created to 457 read: 458 402.89âSurrogacy agencies.â 459 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 460 (a)ââCommissioning coupleâ means the intended father and 461 mother of a child who will be conceived by means of assisted 462 reproductive technology as defined in s. 383.61 using the eggs 463 or sperm of at least one of the intended parents. 464 (b)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Children and 465 Families. 466 (c)ââDisqualified personâ means a person who fails to meet 467 the level 2 screening standards under s. 435.04. 468 (d)ââGestational surrogateâ means a woman who contracts to 469 become pregnant by means of assisted reproductive technology as 470 defined in s. 383.61 without the use of an egg from her body and 471 with the use of an egg or sperm from the commissioning couple. 472 (e)ââParticipantâ means an individual who provides a 473 biological or genetic component of assisted reproduction or a 474 commissioning couple. 475 (f)ââSurrogacy agencyâ means a person who is in the 476 business of matching, supervising, or coordinating intended 477 parents and surrogates; providing case management, screening, or 478 counseling services to commissioning couples or surrogates; or 479 referring commissioning couples and surrogates to third-party 480 reproductive services. 481 (g)ââSurrogacy contractâ means a written agreement between 482 the commissioning couple and the gestational surrogate or 483 surrogate. 484 (h)ââSurrogateâ means a woman who contracts to become 485 pregnant by means of assisted reproductive technology as defined 486 in s. 383.61 with the use of an egg from her body. 487 (i)ââThird-party reproductive servicesâ means services 488 offered by a donor bank or fertility clinic licensed under s. 489 383.61 related to the use of eggs, sperm, or preembryos that 490 have been donated by a person to enable a couple to become 491 parents. The term includes services related to gestational 492 surrogacy and surrogacy arrangements. 493 (2)âGENERAL REQUIREMENTS.âA surrogacy agency shall do all 494 of the following: 495 (a)âRequire all participants to undergo a mental health 496 evaluation by a mental health professional licensed under 497 chapter 490 or chapter 491, and to undergo a subsequent 498 evaluation every 2 years thereafter as long as the participant 499 remains in the surrogacy agencyâs database or continues to 500 contract for services with the surrogacy agency. The surrogacy 501 agency shall request from the mental health professional 502 performing the evaluation a written statement that the mental 503 health professional has met with and cleared the participant for 504 continued participation in the surrogacy process. The surrogacy 505 agency shall retain a copy of the written statement for each 506 participant. The surrogacy agency shall require all participants 507 to sign a release authorizing the surrogacy agency to obtain the 508 results of the mental health evaluation. 509 (b)âRequire all donors, gestational surrogates, and 510 surrogates to undergo a medical evaluation by a physician 511 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459. The surrogacy agency 512 shall request from the physician performing the evaluation a 513 written statement that the physician has met with and cleared 514 the donor, gestational surrogate, or surrogate for continued 515 participation in the surrogacy process. The surrogacy agency 516 shall retain a copy of the written statement for each donor, 517 gestational surrogate, or surrogate. The surrogacy agency shall 518 require all donors, gestational surrogates, and surrogates to 519 sign a release authorizing the surrogacy agency to obtain the 520 results of the medical evaluation. 521 (c)âObtain a level 2 security background investigation 522 consistent with s. 435.04 from the department through the Care 523 Provider Background Screening Clearinghouse under s. 435.12, and 524 obtain an updated security background investigation every 5 525 years thereafter as long as the participant remains in the 526 surrogacy agencyâs database or is still contracting for services 527 with the surrogacy agency. 528 1.âFor a donor or surrogate, the surrogacy agency shall 529 obtain the security background investigation before listing the 530 donor or surrogate in the surrogacy agencyâs database of 531 potential donors or surrogates. 532 2.âFor a commissioning couple, the surrogacy agency shall 533 obtain the security background investigation before entering 534 into a contract with the commissioning couple to provide 535 database or matching services or referrals for third-party 536 reproductive services. 537 3.âIf the security background investigation finds that an 538 individual is a disqualified person, the surrogacy agency must 539 terminate any existing contract involving the individual, remove 540 the individual from the surrogacy agencyâs database, and notify 541 the donor bank or fertility clinic of the individualâs status as 542 a disqualified person. 543 (d)âRequire a written contract as provided in subsection 544 (4) between the commissioning couple and the surrogacy agency. 545 (e)âRequire that all surrogacy contracts pursuant to s. 546 742.15 between the commissioning couple and the gestational 547 surrogate or surrogate be in writing and require the 548 commissioning couple and gestational surrogate or surrogate to 549 undergo a legal consultation with an attorney who is a member in 550 good standing of The Florida Bar regarding the terms and 551 potential legal consequences of the surrogacy contract. 552 (f)âKeep and maintain all funds that are to be used for the 553 compensation of a donor, gestational surrogate, or surrogate in 554 an account that is separate and apart from the surrogacy 555 agencyâs business accounts as specified in subsection (3). 556 (3)âSECURITY REQUIREMENTS.âA surrogacy agency that requires 557 or receives payment from a participant shall establish and 558 maintain a mechanism for ensuring that those funds are properly 559 maintained. 560 (a)âThe surrogacy agency shall establish an escrow account 561 with an independent escrow agent and deposit into the account 562 all payments received by the surrogacy agency from a 563 commissioning couple. The surrogacy agency is not required to 564 deposit into the escrow account payments received from a 565 commissioning couple which relate to the compensation and 566 operation of the agency. 567 (b)âThe surrogacy agency shall establish the escrow account 568 in a bank, savings and loan association, or trust company 569 incorporated under the laws of this state or with an attorney 570 who is a member in good standing of The Florida Bar. 571 (c)âThe escrow agent shall disburse funds from the escrow 572 account only upon receipt of an affidavit from the surrogacy 573 agency specifying the purpose for which the disbursement is 574 requested. The escrow agent is entitled to rely upon the 575 affidavit of the surrogacy agency and has no obligation to 576 independently ascertain the propriety of the requested 577 disbursement so long as the escrow agent has no actual knowledge 578 that the affidavit is false in any respect. The escrow agent 579 shall retain all affidavits received pursuant to this paragraph 580 for 5 years. 581 (d)âThe escrow agent shall maintain the account in such a 582 manner that it is under the direct supervision and control of 583 the escrow agent. The escrow agent has a fiduciary duty to each 584 participant to maintain the escrow account in accordance with 585 good accounting principles and to release funds from escrow only 586 in accordance with this subsection. If the escrow agent receives 587 conflicting demands for the escrowed funds, the escrow agent may 588 not disburse any funds and must immediately notify the surrogacy 589 agency and the affected participant of the dispute. 590 (e)âFailure of a surrogacy agency to place funds in an 591 escrow account within 10 days after receipt of the funds is 592 prima facie evidence of a violation of this subsection. 593 (4)âCONTRACT REQUIREMENTS.âA contract entered into by a 594 surrogacy agency and a participant to provide database or 595 matching services or referrals for third-party reproductive 596 services must be in writing. The written contract must contain 597 all provisions, requirements, and prohibitions required by this 598 subsection before it is signed by the participant. The surrogacy 599 agency shall provide a copy of the signed contract to the 600 participant at the time the participant signs the contract and 601 shall provide another copy to the donor bank or fertility clinic 602 licensed under s. 383.61. A contract to provide database or 603 matching services or referrals for third-party reproductive 604 services must include all of the following: 605 (a)âThe participantâs total payment obligation for services 606 to be received pursuant to the contract. 607 (b)âThe agreed-upon payment plan, if the contract calls for 608 payment in installments. 609 (c)âAll contracted services, set forth in specific terms. 610 (d)âPrescribed in bold-faced type and under conspicuous 611 caption, all cancellation provisions of the contract. 612 (e)âThe length of time that the contract remains valid and 613 the circumstances under which the contract is terminated. 614 (5)âRULES.âBy December 31, 2026, the department shall adopt 615 rules to implement this section and establish minimum standards 616 for the certification and operation of surrogacy agencies. The 617 rules must include, at a minimum, all of the following: 618 (a)âRequirements for screening of participants. 619 (b)âRequirements for background screening of surrogacy 620 agency personnel. 621 (c)âFinancial responsibility standards. 622 (d)âConfidentiality and recordkeeping standards, including 623 retention of records. 624 (e)âTraining requirements for surrogacy agency staff on 625 surrogacy ethics, legal risks, counseling, and conflict 626 management. 627 (f)âProcedures for complaint handling, corrective action 628 plans, and sanctions. 629 (6)âCERTIFICATION.â 630 (a)âA surrogacy agency operating in this state must apply 631 for and maintain certification issued by the department. 632 Surrogacy agencies in operation as of the date that rules 633 initially adopted under this section become effective shall have 634 6 months from that date to become certified. A certification is 635 valid for 2 years, unless suspended or revoked for cause. The 636 department shall inspect a surrogacy agency applying for 637 certification before initial certification, and at least 638 annually thereafter, to verify compliance with certification 639 standards. 640 (b)âIf a surrogacy agency fails to comply with this section 641 or the rules adopted under this section, the department may take 642 administrative action, including, but not limited to, 643 authorization of continued operation under a corrective action 644 plan, imposition of administrative fines, and suspension or 645 revocation of certification. 646 (7)âCERTIFIED SURROGACY AGENCIES LIST.âThe department shall 647 maintain a publicly accessible list of certified surrogacy 648 agencies, including the certification status of such agencies. 649 Section 4.âSection 742.13, Florida Statutes, is reordered 650 and amended to read: 651 742.13âDefinitions.âAs used in ss. 742.11-742.17, the term: 652 (1)ââAssisted reproductive technologyâ means those 653 procreative procedures which involve the laboratory handling of 654 human eggs, sperm, or preembryos, including, but not limited to, 655 in vitro fertilization embryo transfer, gamete intrafallopian 656 transfer, pronuclear stage transfer, tubal embryo transfer, and 657 zygote intrafallopian transfer. 658 (2)ââCommissioning coupleâ means the intended mother and 659 father of a child who will be conceived by means of assisted 660 reproductive technology using the eggs or sperm of at least one 661 of the intended parents. 662 (3)ââDisqualified personâ means a person who fails to meet 663 the level 2 screening standards under s. 435.04. 664 (4)(3)ââEggâ means the unfertilized female reproductive 665 cell. 666 (5)(4)ââFertilizationâ means the initial union of an egg 667 and sperm. 668 (8)(5)ââGestational surrogateâ means a woman who contracts 669 to become pregnant by means of assisted reproductive technology 670 without the use of an egg from her body and with the use of an 671 egg or sperm from the commissioning couple. 672 (7)(6)ââGestational surrogacyâ means a state that results 673 from a process in which a commissioning coupleâs eggs or sperm, 674 or both, are mixed in vitro and the resulting preembryo is 675 implanted within another womanâs body. 676 (15)(7)ââGestational Surrogacy contractâ means a written 677 agreement between the gestational surrogate or surrogate and the 678 commissioning couple. 679 (6)(8)ââGamete intrafallopian transferâ means the direct 680 transfer of eggs and sperm into the fallopian tube prior to 681 fertilization. 682 (9)ââImplantationâ means the event that occurs when a 683 fertilized egg adheres to the uterine wall for nourishment. 684 (10)ââIn vitroâ refers to a laboratory procedure performed 685 in an artificial environment outside a womanâs body. 686 (11)ââIn vitro fertilization embryo transferâ means the 687 transfer of an in vitro fertilized preembryo into a womanâs 688 uterus. 689 (12)ââPreembryoâ means the product of fertilization of an 690 egg by a sperm until the appearance of the embryonic axis. 691 (13)ââPronuclear stage transferâ or âzygote intrafallopian 692 transferâ means the transfer of an in vitro fertilized preembryo 693 into the fallopian tube before cell division takes place. 694 (14)ââSpermâ means the male reproductive cell. 695 (16)ââSurrogateâ means a woman who contracts to become 696 pregnant by means of assisted reproductive technology with the 697 use of an egg from her body. 698 (17)(15)ââTubal embryo transferâ means the transfer of a 699 dividing, in vitro fertilized preembryo into the fallopian tube. 700 Section 5.âSubsections (1), (2), and (3) of section 742.15, 701 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 702 742.15âGestational Surrogacy contract.â 703 (1)âBefore Prior to engaging in gestational surrogacy or 704 surrogacy, a binding and enforceable gestational surrogacy 705 contract must shall be made between the commissioning couple and 706 the gestational surrogate or surrogate. A contract for 707 gestational surrogacy is shall not be binding and enforceable 708 unless: 709 (a)âThe gestational surrogate or surrogate is 18 years of 710 age or older and is not a disqualified person; and 711 (b)âThe commissioning couple are legally married and are 712 both 18 years of age or older; 713 (c)âNeither member of the commissioning couple is a 714 disqualified person; 715 (d)âEach member of the commissioning couple is a United 716 States citizen, a lawful and permanent resident of the United 717 States, or domiciled in this state and lawfully present in the 718 United States under federal law; 719 (e)âThe gestational surrogate or surrogate is domiciled in 720 this state and is a United States citizen or lawful permanent 721 resident of the United States; and 722 (f)âThe contract was drafted by an attorney who is a member 723 in good standing of The Florida Bar. 724 (2)âThe commissioning couple may shall enter into a 725 contract with a gestational surrogate only if when, within 726 reasonable medical certainty as determined and stated in a 727 written statement under oath by a physician licensed under 728 chapter 458 or chapter 459: 729 (a)âThe commissioning mother cannot physically gestate a 730 pregnancy to term; 731 (b)âThe gestation will cause a risk to the physical health 732 of the commissioning mother; or 733 (c)âThe gestation will cause a risk to the health of the 734 fetus. 735 (3)âA gestational surrogacy contract must include the 736 following provisions, as applicable: 737 (a)âThe commissioning couple agrees that the gestational 738 surrogate or surrogate is shall be the sole source of consent 739 with respect to clinical intervention and management of the 740 pregnancy. 741 (b)âThe gestational surrogate or surrogate agrees to submit 742 to reasonable medical evaluation and treatment and to adhere to 743 reasonable medical instructions about her prenatal health. 744 (c)âThe commissioning couple agrees not to reduce any 745 amount paid to the gestational surrogate or surrogate if the 746 child is stillborn or is born alive but impaired, or to provide 747 for the payment of a supplement or bonus for any reason. 748 (d)âThe commissioning couple agrees that they may not 749 require the termination of the gestational surrogateâs or 750 surrogateâs pregnancy. 751 (e)âExcept as provided in paragraph (g) (e), the 752 gestational surrogate or surrogate agrees to relinquish any 753 parental rights upon the childâs birth and to proceed with the 754 judicial proceedings prescribed under s. 742.16. 755 (f)(d)âExcept as provided in paragraph (g) (e), the 756 commissioning couple agrees to accept custody of and to assume 757 full parental rights and responsibilities for the child 758 immediately upon the childâs birth, regardless of any impairment 759 of the child. 760 (g)(e)âThe gestational surrogate agrees to assume parental 761 rights and responsibilities for the child born to her if it is 762 determined that neither member of the commissioning couple is 763 the genetic parent of the child. 764 (h)âThe parties understand that the surrogacy contract is 765 void and that a court may not affirm the parentage of the 766 commissioning couple if a member of the commissioning couple is 767 a disqualified person as defined in s. 742.13. 768 Section 6.âSection 742.155, Florida Statutes, is created to 769 read: 770 742.155âPreconception validation of surrogacy contract.â 771 (1)âThe commissioning couple and the prospective 772 gestational surrogate or surrogate may petition a court to 773 validate a surrogacy contract if: 774 (a)âThe prospective gestational surrogate or surrogate or 775 the commissioning couple has resided in this state for the 90 776 day period preceding the date the petition is filed; 777 (b)âThe prospective gestational surrogateâs or surrogateâs 778 husband, if she is married, is joined as a party to the 779 proceeding; and 780 (c)âA copy of the surrogacy contract is attached to the 781 petition. 782 (2)âThe court may validate a surrogacy contract as provided 783 by subsection (3) only if the court finds that: 784 (a)âThe medical evidence provided for a contract with a 785 gestational surrogate shows that: 786 1.âThe commissioning mother cannot physically gestate a 787 pregnancy to term; 788 2.âThe gestation will cause a risk to the physical health 789 of the commissioning mother; or 790 3.âThe gestation will cause a risk to the health of the 791 fetus; 792 (b)âA favorable preliminary home study of the intended 793 parents has been performed consistent with s. 63.092; 794 (c)âEach party to the contract has voluntarily entered into 795 and understands the terms of the contract; 796 (d)âThe contract includes the provisions required by s. 797 742.15 and does not include any prohibited provisions; 798 (e)âNone of the parties to the contract are disqualified 799 persons; and 800 (f)âThe parties have adequately specified which party is 801 responsible for all reasonable health care expenses associated 802 with the pregnancy, including specifying which party is 803 responsible for such expenses if the contract is terminated. 804 (3)âIf the court finds that the requirements of subsection 805 (2) are satisfied, the court may render an order validating the 806 surrogacy contract and declaring that the commissioning couple 807 will be the parents of a child born under the agreement, except 808 as provided in s. 742.16 relating to proceedings to affirm the 809 parental status of a child conceived through gestational 810 surrogacy or surrogacy. 811 (4)âThe court may validate the surrogacy contract at the 812 courtâs discretion. The courtâs determination of whether to 813 validate the surrogacy contract is subject to review only for 814 abuse of discretion. 815 Section 7.âPresent subsections (7), (8), and (9) of section 816 742.16, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (8), 817 (9), and (10), respectively, a new subsection (7) is added to 818 that section, and subsections (1) and (3), paragraph (a) of 819 subsection (4), subsection (6), and present subsections (7) and 820 (8) of that section are amended, to read: 821 742.16âExpedited affirmation of parental status for 822 gestational surrogacy.â 823 (1)âWithin 3 days after the birth of a child delivered of a 824 gestational surrogate or surrogate, the commissioning couple 825 shall petition a court of competent jurisdiction in the circuit 826 where the commissioning couple or gestational surrogate or 827 surrogate resides for an expedited affirmation of parental 828 status. After a commissioning couple petitions the court for the 829 affirmation of parental status, the clerk of the court shall 830 request and obtain a level 2 security background investigation 831 as described in s. 435.04 of the commissioning couple from the 832 Department of Law Enforcement and provide the results to the 833 court. 834 (3)âUpon a showing by the commissioning couple, or the 835 child, or the gestational surrogate or surrogate that privacy 836 rights may be endangered, the court may order the names of the 837 commissioning couple, or the child, or the gestational surrogate 838 or surrogate, or any combination thereof, to be deleted from the 839 notice of hearing and from the copy of the petition attached 840 thereto, provided the substantive rights of any person will not 841 thereby be affected. 842 (4)âNotice of the hearing shall be given by the 843 commissioning couple to: 844 (a)âThe gestational surrogate or surrogate. 845 (6)âThe commissioning couple or their legal representative 846 shall appear at the hearing on the petition. At the conclusion 847 of the hearing, the court shall enter an order stating that the 848 commissioning couple are the legal parents of the child if the 849 court determines that: 850 (a)âafter the court has determined that A binding and 851 enforceable gestational surrogacy contract has been executed 852 pursuant to s. 742.15; 853 (b)âand that At least one member of the commissioning 854 couple is the genetic parent of the child, if the child was to 855 have been conceived pursuant to a surrogacy contract with a 856 gestational surrogate; and 857 (c)âNeither the intended mother nor the intended father is 858 a disqualified person the court shall enter an order stating 859 that the commissioning couple are the legal parents of the 860 child. 861 (7)âIf the affirmation of parentage is denied because a 862 member of the commissioning couple is a disqualified person: 863 (a)âThe gestational surrogate or surrogate shall be deemed 864 the natural mother of the child and have the right to child 865 support from the commissioning couple; 866 (b)âThe commissioning couple may not be granted time 867 sharing or parental responsibility; and 868 (c)âThe consent of the commissioning couple is not required 869 for the adoption of the child. 870 (8)(7)âIf When at least one member of the commissioning 871 couple is the genetic parent of the child born to a gestational 872 surrogate or surrogate, the commissioning couple shall be 873 presumed to be the natural parents of the child. 874 (9)(8)âWithin 30 days after entry of the order affirming 875 the parental status of the commissioning couple, the clerk of 876 the court shall prepare a certified statement of the order for 877 the state registrar of vital statistics on a form provided by 878 the registrar. The court shall thereupon enter an order 879 requiring the Department of Health to issue a new birth 880 certificate naming the commissioning couple as parents and 881 requiring the department to seal the original birth certificate. 882 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.